North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 39. Interstate Compact on Adoption and Medical Assistance.

§ 7B-3900.
Legislative findings and purposes.

Finding adoptive families for children, for whom state assistance is desirable pursuant to

G.S. 108A-49

and

G.S. 108A-50

, and assuring the protection of the interests of the children affected during the entire assistance period require special measures when the adoptive parents move to another state or are residents of another state. Additionally, the provision of medical and other necessary services for children receiving State assistance encounters special difficulties when the provision of services takes place in another state.

In recognition of the need for special measures, the General Assembly authorizes the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services to enter into interstate agreements with agencies of other states for the protection of children on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the Department of Health and Human Services and to provide procedures for interstate adoption assistance payments, including payments for medical services.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Preserving Your Right to Parent: The Supreme Court of North Carolina Addresses Unmarried Fathers’ Due Process Rights in In Re Adoption of S.D.W.,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 723 (2016).

§ 7B-3901.
Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, as used in this Article:

“Adoption assistance state” means the state that is a signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case.

“Residence state” means the state where the child is living.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands, or any territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.

§ 7B-3902.
Compacts authorized.

The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services may develop, participate in the development of, negotiate, and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this State with other states to implement this Article. When entered into, and for so long as it remains in force, such a compact shall have the full force and effect of law.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.

§ 7B-3903.
Content of compacts.

A compact under this Article shall contain all of the following provisions:

A provision making it available for joinder by all states.

A provision for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, with a period of at least one year between the date of the notice and effective date of the withdrawal.

A requirement that the protections afforded by or under the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and apply to all children and their adoptive parents who, on the effective date of the withdrawal, are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the state in which they are a resident and have their principal place of abode.

A requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency of the state which undertakes to provide the adoption assistance and that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency providing the adoption assistance.

Any other provisions appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

A compact entered into under this Article may contain any of the following provisions:

Provisions establishing procedures and entitlement to medical and other necessary social services for the child in accordance with applicable laws, even though the child and the adoptive parents are in a state other than the one responsible for or providing the services or the funds to defray part or all of the expense thereof.

Any other provisions appropriate or incidental to the proper administration of the compact.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.

§ 7B-3904.
Medical assistance.

A child with special needs who is a resident of this State who is the subject of an adoption assistance agreement with another state shall be accepted as being entitled to receive medical assistance certification from this State upon the filing in the department of social services of the county in which the child resides a certified copy of the adoption assistance agreement obtained from the adoption assistance state.

The Division of Health Benefits shall consider the holder of a medical assistance certification under this section to be entitled to the same medical benefits under the laws of this State as any other holder of a medical assistance certification and shall process and make payment on claims on account of that holder in the same manner and under the same conditions and procedures that apply to other recipients of medical assistance.

The provisions of this section apply only to medical assistance for children under adoption assistance agreements from states that have entered into a compact with this State under which the other state provides medical assistance to children with special needs under adoption assistance agreements made by this State.

History.

1999-190, s. 5; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Division of Health Benefits” for “Division of Medical Assistance” in subsection (b).

§ 7B-3905.
Federal participation.

The Department of Health and Human Services, in connection with the administration of this Article and any compact entered into pursuant to this Article, shall include the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all of the cost in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-272), Titles IV (E) and XIX of the Social Security Act and any other applicable federal laws. The Department shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.

§ 7B-3906.
Compact Administrator.

The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services may appoint a Compact Administrator who shall be the general coordinator of activities under this Compact in this State and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, may promulgate rules to carry out more effectively the terms and provisions of this Compact.

History.

1999-190, s. 5.